Utah statutes.
70C-2-202.   Assignment of earnings prohibited.

A creditor may not directly or indirectly take or receive from a debtor an obligation that constitutes or contains an assignment of wages or other earnings unless (1) the assignment by its own terms is revocable at the will of the debtor, (2) the assignment is a payroll deduction plan, commencing at the time of the transaction, in which the debtor authorized a series of wage deductions as a method of making each payment, or (3)  the assignment applies only to wages or other earnings already earned at the time of the assignment.



Enacted by Chapter 159, 1985 General Session

